Hawaii statutes.
[§132C-2] Definitions. For the
purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Cigarette" means:

(1) Any roll for smoking, whether made wholly or in
part of tobacco or any other substance, irrespective of size or shape, and
whether or not the tobacco or substance is flavored, adulterated, or mixed with
any other ingredient, with a wrapper or cover that is made of paper or any
other substance or material, other than tobacco; or

(2) Any roll for smoking wrapped in any substance
containing tobacco, which, due to its appearance, the type of tobacco used in
the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to or
purchased by consumers as a cigarette as described in paragraph (1).

"Dealer" means the same as defined in
section 245-1.

"Manufacturer" means:

(1) Any entity that manufactures or otherwise
produces cigarettes or causes cigarettes to be manufactured or produced
anywhere, and intends to sell these cigarettes:

(A) In this State; or

(B) Anywhere in the United
States through an importer;

(2) The first purchaser anywhere that intends to
resell in the United States cigarettes manufactured anywhere that the original
manufacturer or maker does not intend to be sold in the United States; or

(3) Any entity that becomes a successor of an entity
described in paragraph (1) or (2).

"Quality control and quality assurance
program" means laboratory procedures implemented to ensure that operator
bias, systematic and nonsystematic methodological errors, and equipment-related
problems do not affect the results of the testing and to ensure that the
testing repeatability remains within the required repeatability value for any
test trial used to certify cigarettes under this chapter.

"Repeatability" means the range of
values within which the repeat results of cigarette test trials from a single
laboratory will fall ninety-five per cent of the time.

"Sale" or "selling" means
any transfer of title or possession, exchange, or barter, conditional or
otherwise, and includes the giving of cigarettes as samples, prizes, or gifts,
and the exchange of cigarettes for any consideration.

"Wholesaler" means the same as
defined in section 245-1. [L 2008, c 218, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next